Utah statutes.
58-53-303.   Term of license -- Expiration -- Renewal.
(1) The division shall issue each license  under this chapter in accordance
with a two-year renewal cycle established by rule. The division may by renewal
extend or shorten a  license expiration date by as much as one year to stagger
the renewal cycles it administers.
(2)  Each license automatically expires on the expiration date shown on the
license unless renewed by the licensee in accordance with Section 58-1-308.
